src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-stark_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - brinna - ok : # 
    brinna+V+Inf: brinna
    brinna+V+Ind+Prs: brinner
    brinna+V+Ind+Prt: brann
    brinna+V+Sup: brunnit
    brinna+V+PrfPtc: brunnen
    brinna+V+Imp: brinn
